Maine, session 132, LD1899.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 36 MRSA §5122, sub-§2, ¶AAA is enacted to read:
AAA. For tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2026, medical and dental expenses
paid by the taxpayer or the taxpayer's spouse or dependents during the taxable year to
the extent these medical and dental expenses were not compensated by insurance or
deducted when determining the taxpayer's federal adjusted gross income. A medical
or dental expense eligible for deduction under the Code, regardless of the threshold, is
eligible for the deduction allowed by this paragraph.